Massachusetts, session 194th, H2482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: 
Section 6 of chapter 270 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following: 
(f) No retailer, manufacturer, or third-party entity shall sell or distribute tobacco products 
to any person except through an in-person transaction occurring at a retail establishment where 
both the buyer and the seller are physically present at the time and location of purchase, and the 
buyer’s age is verified through a valid government-issued photo ID. 
SECTION 2: 
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.